Wisconsin, session 2025, SB422.
do enact as follows:SB422,1Section 1. 84.10478 of the statutes is created to read:84.10478 Greg Quinn and Larry Millard Memorial Bridge. (1) The department shall designate and, subject to sub. (2), mark the overpass on I 39 over STH 82 in the town of Oxford in Marquette County as the “Greg Quinn and Larry Millard Memorial Bridge” in recognition and appreciation of the service of these 2 firefighters who lost their lives in the line of duty.(2) Upon receipt of sufficient contributions from interested parties, including any county, city, village, or town, to cover the costs of erecting and maintaining markers at the overpass specified in sub. (1) to clearly identify to motorists the designation of the overpass as the “Greg Quinn and Larry Millard Memorial Bridge,” the department shall erect and maintain the markers. No state funds, other than from the receipt of contributions under this subsection, may be expended for the erection or maintenance of the markers. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/sb422 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/sb422 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB422 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB422 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»SB422: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting